Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 14. Storage Tanks
§ 35-11-1427.
Financial responsibility account.

There is created the environmental pollution financial responsibility account. This account is intended to provide for financial assurance coverage required by federal law for underground storage tanks and establish financial assurance coverage for aboveground storage tanks and shall be for the purpose of compensating third parties for damage caused by releases from one (1) or more tanks. Interest earned by the account shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 98, § 1; 1994, ch. 32, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2017 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in the second sentence, added “for underground storage tanks and establish financial assurance coverage for aboveground storage tanks.”

Refund of LUST tax. —

Laws 2001, ch. 129, § 2, provides that all severance taxes distributed under title 39, chapter 14, to the corrective action account created by §

35-11-1424

and the financial responsibility account created by §

35-11-1427

are to be in the amount of fuel taxes collected under § 39-17-104(c), (§ 39-17-104(a)(iii)), § 39-17-204(b) and § 39-17-204(a)(ii)), less any refunds.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Cited

in

V-1 Oil Co. v. State, 934 P.2d 740,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1997).

§ 35-11-1428.
Uses of financial responsibility account monies.

As provided in this section, the department shall, on application by an owner or operator, direct the payment of monies from the financial responsibility account to satisfy judgments against the owner or operator for third party property damage or personal injury.

The attorney general shall be served by certified mail return receipt requested with a copy of the complaint filed in any suit initiated against an owner or operator for third party property damage or personal injury. Service of the complaint on the attorney general is a jurisdictional requirement in order to maintain the suit. The attorney general shall be notified in writing by certified mail return receipt requested of any judgment, compromise, settlement or release entered into by an owner or operator. As provided in this section, the department shall, on application by an owner or operator, direct the payment of monies from the financial responsibility account to pay settlements for third party property damage or personal injury on terms negotiated by the attorney general and approved by the council.

The monies from the financial responsibility account shall only be used to pay judgments and settlements not to exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00), for all the damages arising from releases from one (1) or more of the tanks on a site, provided that the owner or operator:

Shall remain liable for payment of the judgment or settlement up to, but not exceeding, thirty thousand dollars ($30,000.00). The department may bring an action against the owner or operator to recover any amount paid by the department pursuant to a judgment or settlement for which the owner or operator remains liable under this paragraph;

Has not been relieved of his responsibility for the judgment or settlement by operation of law or otherwise. For purposes of this paragraph, an owner or operator shall not be deemed to have been relieved of his responsibility for the judgment or settlement by virtue of the Governmental Claims Act [1-39-101 et seq.]; and

Pays the tank fee required by W.S. 35-11-1424(e) or

35-11-1425

, conducts a minimum site assessment, as defined by rule and regulation, and, if contamination is found, takes action to prevent continuing contamination.

Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize the department to obligate funds from the financial responsibility account for payment of costs which may be associated with, but are not integral to, the personal injury or property damage such as the costs for modifying, removing or replacing tanks.

The department shall establish a priority list for purposes of the financial responsibility account. The department shall not approve use of monies from the financial responsibility account if there are insufficient monies in the account to fund the application before the department and all other outstanding commitments.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize commitments to cover property or personal injury damages in excess of the balance in the financial responsibility account.

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of notification that the financial responsibility account has become incapable of paying for assured third party compensation costs, the owner or operator shall obtain alternate financial assurance.

History.

Laws 1990, ch. 98, § 1; 1993, ch. 207, § 1; 1994, ch. 32, § 1.

Provision not applicable. —

Wyo. Stat. § 35-11-1428(b) did not apply in an action by the beneficiaries of a trust against the trustee for breach of its duties under the trust, including the duty to act in good faith with respect to trust property.
Wells Fargo Bank v. Hodder, 2006 WY 128, 144 P.3d 401,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2006).

Cited

in

Wilson v. Amoco Corp., 989 F. Supp. 1159, 1998 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 57 (D. Wyo. 1998).

§ 35-11-1429.
Tank requirements; rulemaking authority.

Cathodic protection shall be installed and operated on all internally lined underground storage tanks no later than June 30, 2008.

All underground storage tank systems that dispense more than five hundred thousand (500,000) gallons per month of a regulated substance shall be replaced with double wall tanks and lines with interstitial leak monitoring no later than June 30, 2012, or thirty (30) years from the date of installation of the underground storage tank, whichever is later.

Double wall underground storage tanks and lines with interstitial leak monitoring shall be installed whenever any underground storage tank is installed.

Double wall underground storage tank system lines with interstitial leak monitoring shall be installed whenever any line is installed on any underground storage tank system. Except piping connected to field-constructed underground storage tank systems with a capacity exceeding fifty thousand (50,000) gallons or piping that is used for an airport hydrant system, if existing single wall underground piping connected to an underground storage tank system fails due to corrosion or fails and has been recalled by the manufacturer, the entire run of single wall piping shall be replaced with double wall piping with interstitial monitoring regardless of the length of piping requiring repair.

The council may promulgate rules and regulations to administer this section after recommendation from the director.

A double wall and interstitially monitored underground storage tank or underground piping installed after December 1, 2005, shall be interstitially monitored for the lifetime of the tank or piping.

Except essential homeland security systems, emergency generator systems and systems used for other disaster relief efforts, if a new piping interstitial monitoring system is installed and sump sensors are used as standalone automatic leak detectors, the system shall be configured to shut off the flow of product in that piping run when a sump sensor triggers an alarm.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 88, § 1; 2017 ch. 35, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (d), added the second sentence; added (f) and (g).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 172, § 1, also enacted a §

35-11-1429

, but it was renumbered as §

35-11-1430

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 88, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

§ 35-11-1430.
[Repealed.]

W.S. 35-11-1430(b) repealed this section effective June 30, 2009.

Editor's notes. —

This section which derived from Laws 2007 ch 172 § 1, related to aboveground storage tanks, minimum site assessments, construction requirements, upgrades, and leak detection; underground lines.

§ 35-11-1431.
Tank system operators, installers and testers licensing; rulemaking authority.

After recommendation from the director and consultation with the appropriate advisory boards, the council shall promulgate rules and regulations to develop standards for the licensure of all tank system operators, installers and testers. At minimum, those rules and regulations shall:

Prescribe licensure requirements for any person installing, modifying or testing an underground or aboveground storage tank;

Prescribe class A and B operator licensure requirements which shall include passing a department approved exam;

Prescribe training requirements for class C operators;

Require at least one (1) person present on the job site to be licensed by the department to install or modify a tank system.

History.

2017 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 35, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 35-11-1432.
Temporarily out of use tanks; rulemaking.

Except tanks within operating facilities, any underground or aboveground storage tank that has been temporarily out of use for more than twelve (12) months shall be permanently closed in accordance with department rule and regulation not later than twelve (12) months after the date on which the tank is placed in temporarily out of use status or July 1, 2018, whichever is later, unless a time extension is authorized in writing by the department.

History.

2017 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective date. —

Laws 2017, ch. 35, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.